Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the wolf population has grown steadily for 14 consecutive years since the first pack was confirmed in 2008. The northeast and southeast Washington habitat has mostly been occupied by wolves and as such, they are increasing their presence in the north and central Cascades and making an appearance in the south Cascades. State law currently requires a species to be likely to become an endangered species within the foreseeable future in order for the regulatory status of "threatened" to apply. The legislature finds that this definition does not fit the situation of the wolves at the effective date of this section. The legislature finds that "sensitive" species designation is the more appropriate regulatory status for wolves. The legislature finds that the "sensitive" status will protect wolves from unlawful take and harassment as well as preclude hunting because regulatory classification as a "sensitive" species requires cooperative management and removal of threats. The legislature also finds that this status must be reviewed in two years from the effective date of this section.Sec. 2. RCW 77.12.020 and 2014 c 202 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The director shall investigate the habits and distribution of the various species of wildlife native to or adaptable to the habitats of the state. The commission shall determine whether a species should be managed by the department and, if so, classify it under this section.(2) The commission may classify by rule wild animals as game animals and game animals as fur-bearing animals.(3) The commission may classify by rule wild birds as game birds or predatory birds. All wild birds not otherwise classified are protected wildlife.(4) In addition to those species listed in RCW 77.08.020, the commission may classify by rule as game fish other species of the class Osteichthyes that are commonly found in fresh water except those classified as food fish by the director.(5) The director may recommend to the commission that a species of wildlife should not be hunted or fished. The commission may designate species of wildlife as protected.(6) If the director determines that a species of wildlife is seriously threatened with extinction in the state of Washington, the director may request its designation as an endangered species. ((The))Except as provided in section 3 of this act, the commission may designate an endangered species.(7) If the director determines that a species of the animal kingdom, not native to Washington, is dangerous to the environment or wildlife of the state, the director may request its designation as deleterious exotic wildlife. The commission may designate deleterious exotic wildlife.(8) Upon recommendation by the director, the commission may develop a work plan to eradicate native aquatic species that threaten human health. Priority shall be given to water bodies that the department of health has classified as representing a threat to human health based on the presence of a native aquatic species.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. The department of fish and wildlife must implement the recommendation from the department's periodic status review published in February 2024, and presented to the fish and wildlife commission on June 22, 2024, to change the status of the gray wolf from endangered status to sensitive status. In accordance with the department of fish and wildlife's recommendation, the purpose of the change of classification to sensitive status is to continue to protect the wolves from unlawful take under chapter 77.15 RCW, from malicious and intentional harassment, and from unlawful hunting, take, or harassment. While under the sensitive status designation, the department shall administer chapter 77.12 RCW to prohibit the hunting of wolves and make conservation of the species and their habitat a priority. Wolves would not be hunted and would remain on the list of priority habitats and species. The sensitive species designation must remain until the department of fish and wildlife's next proposed review. The species must not revert to endangered unless the population is shown to be vulnerable or declining below the population count as of the effective date of this section. NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. The director of the department of fish and wildlife must take the necessary steps on the effective date of this section to ensure that this act is implemented as soon as practicable.--- END ---